California, session 20252026, SB1114.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44230.6 of the Education Code is amended to read:44230.6. (a) For purposes of the ongoing evaluation of teacher preparation programs at the California State University, the commission may provide to the Office of the Chancellor of the California State University or the State Department of Education any data it collects, including non-personally identifiable educator identification numbers established pursuant to Section 44230.5 and any other student identifiers necessary for purposes of the ongoing evaluation of these programs at the California State University.(b) The commission may disclose data pursuant to subdivision (a) only to the extent permitted by state and federal privacy laws, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).(c) (1) The commission shall directly collect voluntary demographic data as to the ancestry or ethnic origin of California credential applicants and voluntary self-identification information pertaining to sexual orientation and gender identity of an initial or renewal applicant who submits an application online or in paper form as part of the initial or renewal application, or who completes a recommendation for an applicant formally recommended by a commission-approved program. The collection of this data on the application shall meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 8310.8 of the Government Code.(2) The commission shall not disclose personally identifiable information collected pursuant to this subdivision.SEC. 2. Section 66027 of the Education Code is amended to read:66027. (a) (1) The Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing board of each community college district are requested to, in collecting data relative to gender, race, ethnicity, or other demographics, from faculty, staff, or students, allow the faculty, staff, and students to identify their sexual orientation, gender identity, and gender expression on any forms used to collect that demographic data, as appropriate.(2) A governing board shall not be required to update an existing form used to collect demographic data for purposes of this subdivision, but shall provide for the identification of sexual orientation, gender identity, and gender expression on any new or updated form used for the collection of demographic data.(b) The Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges are requested to report aggregate information collected pursuant to subdivision (a), to the extent that individuals from whom that information is collected authorize that information to be released where other demographic data is traditionally aggregated and reported for informational purposes and is appropriate. Any report developed shall be transmitted to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of, the Government Code, no later than January 1 of each year and shall be made available to the general public on the internet website of each respective institution. The information reported pursuant to this subdivision shall not include any individual identifying information.(c) Information collected pursuant this section is subject to the disclosure restrictions described under paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 8310.8 of the Government Code and penalties described under paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 8310.8 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. Section 8310.8 of the Government Code is amended to read:8310.8. (a) For the purposes of this section, “information pertaining to SOGISC” means information pertaining to any of the following:(1) A person’s sexual orientation identity.(2) A person’s gender identity or gender expression. identity.(3) A person’s identification as intersex, or identification as possessing sex characteristics that vary from those typically associated with a person’s sex assigned at birth.(4) For purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d), information pertaining to SOGISC also includes information that could reasonably be used to infer a person’s transgender or intersex status, including any of the following:(A) A person’s self-identification as transgender, nonbinary, or a gender other than man/male or woman/female.(B) Information about a person’s gender identity and their sex assigned at birth that is stored or disclosed in a manner that may result in a person being classified as transgender or intersex.(C) Administrative records of gender marker change or documentation submitted in conjunction with a request for gender marker change.(D) Medical information related to transgender or intersex status not otherwise protected under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) (Public Law 104-191) and the California Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (CMIA) (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code). (b) (1) This section shall only apply to the following state entities:(A) The State Department of Health Care Services.(B) The State Department of Public Health.(C) The State Department of Social Services.(D) The California Department of Aging.(E) The State Department of Education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, except this section shall not apply to the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System (CALPADS).(F) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing.(G) The Civil Rights Department.(H) The Labor and Workforce Development Agency.(I) The Department of Industrial Relations.(J) The Employment Training Panel.(K) The Employment Development Department, except this section shall not apply to the unemployment insurance program within the department.(L) The State Department of State Hospitals.(M) The Department of Rehabilitation.(N) The State Department of Developmental Services.(O) The Department of Community Services and Development.(2) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Intersex Disparities Reduction Act.(c) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), in addition to the duties imposed by Section 8310.5 and to the extent permissible by federal law, the state entities identified in subdivision (b), in the course of collecting demographic data directly or by contract as to the ancestry or ethnic origin of Californians, shall collect voluntary self-identification information pertaining to SOGISC.(2) The state entities identified in subdivision (b) may, but are not required to, collect demographic data pursuant to this section under either of the following circumstances:(A) Pursuant to federal programs or surveys, whereby the guidelines for demographic data collection categories are defined by the federal program or survey.(B) Demographic data are collected by other entities including:(i) State offices, departments, and agencies not included in subdivision (b).(ii) Surveys administered by third-party entities and the state department is not the sole funder.(iii) Third-party entities, including, but not limited to, private employers, that provide aggregated data to a state department.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the State Department of Public Health shall collect demographic data pursuant to this section from third parties, including, but not limited to, local health jurisdictions, on any forms or electronic data systems, unless prohibited by federal or state law. This section does not require either of the following:(A) The State Department of Public Health to collect demographic data pursuant to this section from an individual under 18 years of age who is applying for, or participating in, the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children.(B) Health care providers or other third parties to collect, disclose, or report information that is not voluntarily provided self-identification information pertaining to SOGISC.(d) (1) The state entities identified in subdivision (b) shall report to the Legislature the data collected pursuant to this section and the method used to collect those data, and make the data available to the public in accordance with state and federal law, except for personal identifying information, which shall be deemed confidential and shall not be disclosed.(2) The state entities identified in subdivision (b) shall not report demographic data that would permit identification of individuals or would result in statistical unreliability. Demographic reports on data collected pursuant to this section, to prevent identification of individuals, may aggregate categories at a state, county, city, census tract, or ZIP Code level to facilitate comparisons and identify disparities.(3) The state entities identified in subdivision (b) may use information voluntarily provided about SOGISC only for demographic analysis, coordination of care, quality improvement of its services, conducting approved research, fulfilling reporting requirements, and guiding policy or funding decisions. All information about SOGISC collected pursuant to this section shall be used only for purposes specified in this section.(4) (A) Information pertaining to SOGISC collected pursuant to this section may not be disclosed in personally identifiable form a manner allowing personal identification to any entity outside of California state government, or a vendor contracted to provide services to the California state government, except if either of the following apply:(i) Pursuant to a contract or data sharing agreement where the reporting of SOGISC elements is an explicit and mandatory condition for participation in a federal or interstate program or survey.(ii) Pursuant to a subpoena or warrant or court order that is valid and enforceable in California.(B) Information pertaining to SOGISC reported in an identifiable form shall be limited to the minimal extent required to meet the applicable exception, and in compliance with the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).(5) A violation of this section is subject to the penalties described under Article 10 (commencing with Section 1798.55) of Chapter 1 of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code. (e) (1) The state entities identified in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall comply with the requirements of this section as early as possible following the effective date of this section, but no later than July 1, 2018, except as specified in paragraph (2).(2) For purposes of data collected pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), the State Department of Public Health shall comply with the requirements of this section as early as possible but no later than March 28, 2029.(f) The state entities identified in subparagraphs (E) to (K), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall comply with the requirements of this section as early as possible following the effective date of this section, but no later than July 1, 2019.(g) The state entities identified in subparagraphs (L) to (O), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall comply with the requirements of this section as early as possible following January 1, 2025, but no later than July 1, 2026.SEC. 4. Section 8310.8.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:8310.8.5. Information pertaining to sexual orientation identity, gender identity, and variations in sex characteristics/intersex status (SOGISC), as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 8310.8, shall be confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1), unless the information pertaining to SOGISC is deidentified.SEC. 5. Section 1808 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:1808. (a) Except where a specific provision of law prohibits the disclosure of records or information or provides for confidentiality, all records of the department relating to the registration of vehicles, other information contained on an application for a driver’s license, abstracts of convictions, and abstracts of accident reports required to be sent to the department in Sacramento, except for abstracts of accidents where, in the opinion of a reporting officer, another individual was at fault, shall be open to public inspection during office hours. All abstracts of accident reports shall be available to law enforcement agencies and courts of competent jurisdiction.(b) The department shall make available or disclose abstracts of convictions and abstracts of accident reports required to be sent to the department in Sacramento, as described in subdivision (a), if the date of the occurrence is not later than the following:(1) Ten years for a violation pursuant to Section 23140, 23152, or 23153.(2) Seven years for a violation designated as two points pursuant to Section 12810, except as provided in paragraph (1) of this subdivision.(3) Three years for accidents and all other violations.(c) The department shall make available or disclose suspensions and revocations of the driving privilege while the suspension or revocation is in effect and for three years following termination of the action or reinstatement of the privilege, except that driver’s license suspension actions taken pursuant to former Sections 13202.6 and 13202.7, Section 17520 of the Family Code, or Section 256 or former Section 11350.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be disclosed only during the actual time period in which the suspension is in effect.(d) The department shall not make available or disclose a suspension or revocation that has been judicially set aside or stayed.(e) The department shall not make available or disclose personal information about a person unless the disclosure is in compliance with the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994 (18 U.S.C. Sec. 2721 et seq.). However, a disclosure is subject to the prohibition in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12800.5.(f) The department shall make available or disclose to the courts and law enforcement agencies a conviction of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, or a conviction of Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, or Section 655 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code for a period of 10 years from the date of the offense for the purpose of imposing penalties mandated by this code, or by other applicable provisions of California law.(g) The department shall make available or disclose to the courts and law enforcement agencies a conviction of Section 191.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code, punished as a felony, for the purpose of imposing penalties mandated by Section 23550.5, or by other applicable provisions of California law.(h) (1) Except as described in paragraph (2), the department shall not make available or disclose personally identifiable information pertaining to sexual orientation, gender identity, and variations in sex characteristics/intersex status (SOGISC), as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 8310.8 of the Government Code, except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 8310.8 of the Government Code.(2) This subdivision does not apply to the sex marker or gender category currently displayed on a driver’s license as described in subdivision (a) of Section 12800, or as displayed on an identification card issued pursuant to Section 13000.SEC. 4.SEC. 6. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 7. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this act, which amend Section 66027 of the Education Code, amend Section 8310.8 of the Government Code, and add Section 8310.8.5 to the Government Code, respectively, impose a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:Due to the sensitive general nature of data relating to sexual orientation, gender identity, and variations in sex characteristics/intersex status (SOGISC) and the need to protect the safety of those who would provide voluntary self-identification information pertaining to their SOGISC, it is necessary to prohibit the public disclosure of personal identifying information that would allow the identification of an individual who provided voluntary self-identification information pertaining to SOGISC.SEC. 5.SEC. 8. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.